testing/kom-tests-tyj.yaml
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: туйъяснысӧ
     туй+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: туйъяснаныс
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: туйъясныскӧд
     туй+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: туйъястӧгныс
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: туйъяснысла
     туй+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3: туйъяссяныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: туйъясаныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: туйъяссьыныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: туйъясаныс
     туй+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: туйъясныслань
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: туйъясланьныс
     туй+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: туйъяссяньныс
     туй+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: туйъясӧдныс
     туй+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl3: туйъястіныс
     туй+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: туйъясӧдзныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl3: туйъясланяныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl3: туйъясланьсьыныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl3: туйъясланяныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl3: туйъясланьсяньныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl3: туйъясланьӧдныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl3: туйъясланьтіныс
     туй+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl3: туйъясланьӧдзныс
